Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1677.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; Arizona department of forestry and fire management; salt cedar mitigation; Gila River; exemption A. The sum of $3,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona department of forestry and fire management for salt cedar mitigation along the Gila River in the area west of State Route 85 to Gillespie Dam and west of McPhaul Bridge to the confluence of the Gila River and the Colorado River. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.